Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1907
Original corners; perpetuation.

It shall be the duty of the county surveyor in surveys made by him or her to perpetuate all original corners not at the time well marked, and all corners or angles that he or she may establish or reestablish, in a permanent manner by setting monuments containing ferromagnetic material, according to the instructions of the State Surveyor.

Laws 1913, c. 43, § 5, p. 143;

R.S.1913, § 5691;

C.S.1922, § 5021;

C.S.1929, § 26-1607;

R.S.1943, § 23-1907;

Laws 1982, LB 127, § 4.